Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB788.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 1502(a) and (d)(2) of the act of March 4, 1971 (P.L.6, No.2), known as the Tax Reform Code of 1971, are amended AND SUBSECTION (D) IS AMENDED BY ADDING A PARAGRAPH to read:Section 1502. Imposition; Report and Payment of Tax; Exemptions.--(a) Every institution shall annually, by April 15 of each year beginning in the year 1984, make a report to the Department of Revenue, setting forth the entire amount of <--12345678910111213141516171819202122 taxable net income received or accrued by said institution from all sources during the preceding year, and such other information as the department may require, and upon such taxable net income the said institution shall pay into the State Treasury, through the Department of Revenue, for the use of the Commonwealth, a State excise tax at the rate of eleven and one-half per cent for the calendar years 1983, 1984, 1985 and 1986 and fiscal years beginning in 1983, 1984, 1985 and 1986, at the rate of twenty per cent for calendar years 1987, 1988, 1989 and 1990 and fiscal years beginning in 1987, 1988, 1989 and 1990 and at the rate of twelve and one-half per cent for calendar year 1991 and fiscal years beginning in 1991 and at the rate of eleven and one-half per cent for calendar year 1992 [and each calendar year thereafter] and fiscal years beginning in 1992 [and each fiscal year thereafter] upon such annual taxable net income, for the privilege of doing business in the Commonwealth. The annual rate of the tax imposed by this section UPON THE TAXPAYER'S ANNUAL INCOME FOR THE PRIVILEGE OF DOING BUSINESS IN THIS COMMONWEALTH for taxable years beginning for the calendar year or fiscal year on or after the dates specified shall be as follows:Taxable Year Tax RateJanuary 1, 2025,through December 31, 2025 8.99%January 1, 2026, through December 31, 2026 8.55%January 1, 2027, through December 20250HB0788PN2871 - 2 - <--<--<--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 31, 2027 7.95%January 1, 2028, through December 31, 2028 7.45%January 1, 2029, through December 31, 2029 6.95%January 1, 2030, through December 31, 2030 6.45%January 1, 2031, through December 31, 2031 5.95%January 1, 2032, through December 31, 2032 5.45%January 1, 2033, and each taxable year thereafter 4.99%Every institution shall be required to make payment of estimated tax pursuant to the provisions of sections 3003.2, 3003.3 and 3003.4 of Article XXX for taxable years beginning after December 31, 1991. For taxable years beginning before January 1, 1992, every institution shall be required to make payment of tentative tax pursuant to the provisions of Article XXX. The remaining portion of the tax due shall be paid at the time the report prescribed herein is required to be made.* * *(d) * * *(1.1) A NET LOSS FOR A TAXABLE YEAR MAY ONLY BE CARRIED OVER 20250HB0788PN2871 - 3 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 PURSUANT TO THE FOLLOWING SCHEDULE:TAXABLE YEAR CARRYOVER2025 AND EARLIER 3 TAXABLE YEARS2026 AND THEREAFTER 6 TAXABLE YEARS(2) [The] Beginning with calendar year 2026 and fiscal years beginning in 2026, the net loss carryover deduction for a taxable year shall be that amount which is the sum of any net losses for the [preceding [three] ten taxable years, beginning with the earliest year, to the extent that any such net loss has not previously been allowed as a deduction in a prior taxable year, except that the deduction shall not exceed the amount of the net income for the current year determined after apportionment.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 120 days.20250HB0788PN2871 - 4 - <--123456789101112131415